 "He added: 'There are mice that are currently being treated for diabetes that are four months old.'"
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical Science Division, warned that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the treatment of diabetes, and notes that these results are not relevant to patients with type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy Nobel Prize literature committee secretary Sara Danius told a radio program on Swedish Radio that the committee had publicly announced that it had given up trying to contact Dylan to inform him of the 2016 Nobel Literature Prize.
 "Danius said, "We're not doing anything right now. I called his closest collaborator and emailed him and got a very nice response. For now, that's enough."
 Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said he started the company when he couldn't hear his doorbell from his shop in the garage.
 He said he made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said in 2013 that sales increased after the Shark Tank episode in which the show's contestants turned down funding for the startup.
 In late 2017, Shiminoff appeared on the shopping television channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with competing security company ADT.
 While one experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality, no drug has yet been clearly proven to treat existing infections.
 The antibody cocktail ZMapp showed promise early on, but formal studies have shown it to be less effective at preventing death than hoped.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation supports the U.S. Olympic Committee’s letter and recognizes the absolute necessity of having Olympic officials to help ensure a safe environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that meaningful change within the organization is a better way to achieve better outcomes for athletes, clubs and the sport.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Team supports an independent investigation into how the facts that Larry Nassar's victims have bravely spoken out about were not brought to light for so long and what is needed and appropriate to ensure that this never happens again.
 The U.S. gymnastics team and the USOC have the same goal: to make the sport of gymnastics, and all sports, as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and supportive environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Brezinski served as an adviser to Kennedy and then worked in the Lyndon Johnson administration.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 campaign, and served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As NSA, he served President Carter in dealing with world problems such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution that led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 Starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, the film was nominated for all the major categories.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other categories include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production, Best Sound Editing, and Best Sound Mixing.
 Two songs from the film, "Dreams of a Fool" and "City of Stars," were nominated for Best Original Song. The Lion's Gate studio received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Donald Trump, the US president, announced in a statement released by his spokesman late on Sunday that the US military would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey also said it would protect captured ISIS fighters whom European countries refuse to repatriate.
 This not only confirms the widely held theory that some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides details that are generally lacking in fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists have revealed that the top of the feather was a deep purple, while the underside was pale or yellow.
 Such findings also provide insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Dinosaur feathers lack the well-developed vane, but have other distinctive features such as barbs and small barbules, and researchers have speculated that these other features later evolved into vanes.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but for thermoregulation or display. The researchers examined samples from the tail of a young dinosaur and said that the feathers were not juvenile, but adult.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but the researchers say that the sample shows that it is not a juvenile's downy feathers, but an adult's feathers.
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning in the police station in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than 20 others.
 The governor said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police say they are investigating the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant (ISIL) militant group as being responsible for the attack.
 They found that the sun works in the same way as other stars, by emitting light and rotating.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation is used to determine the Rossby number of the star, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in the magnetic field reversal.
 During the journey, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by mad dogs in Tibet, nearly married in Nepal, and arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates in both the 2.4GHz and 5.0GHz frequency bands.
 If the base station has dual radios, this allows 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g to be backward compatible.
 802.11n theoretically has a bandwidth of up to 600 Mbit/s, which is considerably faster than the previous standards.
 A married man with two adult children, Duval made no impression on Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, "The microphone was talking a lot during the hearing... I wasn't listening because I was preparing."
 "By 2020, we will make a significant reduction in the per capita carbon dioxide emissions from the 2005 level," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure, saying the scale of the cuts would be based on China's economic output.
 "Hu encouraged developing countries to "break the old habit of polluting first and cleaning up later."
 "But that doesn't mean we should ask them to take on responsibilities beyond their stage of development and capacity," he added.
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12 noon GMT (Greenwich Mean Time) today.
 At this point, there is no guarantee that Iraq's actions will prevent sectarian warfare or violence from increasing, or that chaos will be averted.
 The report begins with a plea for open debate and consensus-building on U.S. policy in the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the administration's current Iraq policy and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 One of the 78 recommendations is that the United States should adopt a new foreign policy by the end of this year to secure its borders and re-establish diplomatic relations with neighboring countries in preparation for hostile Iraqi intervention.
 The current senator and wife of Argentina's president, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the presidency yesterday in La Plata, 50 km from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner announced her presidential candidacy at the same venue, the Argentine Theater, where she began her senatorial campaign in 2005 as part of a Buenos Aires delegation.
 After Hurricane Katrina, spending on relief and reconstruction, and the national debt, became a subject of controversy when some people who were fiscally conservative called it "Bush's New Orleans deal."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the so-called Washington insiders who got reconstruction-related contracts.
 More than 4 million people gathered in Rome for the funeral.
 The number of people who attended was so great that most of them could not enter the funeral service in St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up around Rome to allow people to watch the funeral.
 In many cities in Italy and other cities around the world, especially in Poland, similar screens have been installed so that many people can watch.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy cases, such as stolen cars, in order to artificially inflate its success rate.
 Congress has allocated funding for anti-obscenity measures since the 2005 budget, and the FBI has specified that it must have 10 agents dedicated to the adult pornography sector.
 Robin Uthappa scored the innings best with 41 runs in 4 overs with 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Middle-order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid were in fine form and put on a 100-run partnership.
 However, after losing the wicket, India lost seven wickets to end the innings with 36 runs.
 President George W. Bush began a week-long Asian tour on the morning of November 16, arriving in Singapore.
 He was welcomed by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush, after a week of midterm election defeats, announced a trade expansion policy in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed Tuesday to send the government's "clean air act" to all caucuses for review before a second reading, after a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 "Layton asked for the Conservative Party's environmental legislation to be "radically, comprehensively rewritten" in a meeting with the Prime Minister, and called for changes to the Conservative Party's environmental legislation.
 When the federal government stepped in to take over funding for Mercy Hospital in Tazmania Devonport, state governments and some federal House members accused the move of being part of the federal election campaign in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the move was to prevent the hospital facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government, and he has committed an extra $45 million.
 Recent reports indicate that sea level readings were taken at the time of the tsunami, and that in fact a tsunami did strike near Pago Pago and Niue.
 Tonga reported no major damage or injuries, but power was temporarily cut off and the country's authorities were not able to receive a tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools on or near the coast were closed Wednesday despite the lifting of the warning.
 President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe said of the North's pledge, "It's a major step toward achieving the denuclearization of the Korean Peninsula."
 The 10th hurricane of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed in the Atlantic today.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Tropical Storm Jerry is no longer a threat.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain per hour could overwhelm the breached levee.
 The Ninth Ward, which was inundated by floodwaters up to 20 feet high during Hurricane Katrina, is now being flooded by nearby levees.
 Water flows over the 100-foot-wide levee.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion in a conversation with Wikinews last month.
 "He lied to us from the beginning, first saying it was all because of legal reasons, then acting like he was listening to us until the very end."
 Recent community backlash has led to efforts to create a policy proposal for the inclusion of sexual content on sites that host millions of open licensed media.
 Although it relies heavily on theory, the program is designed to simulate observations of the Andromeda Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for could have been caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and the dark matter in the halo.
 Just as the Moon exerts a gravitational pull on Earth, causing tides, the Milky Way exerts a gravitational pull on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around galaxies is located in a halo around the galaxy, consisting of a large number of small particles.
 TV reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities have warned residents near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not drink tap water.
 According to Japanese government agencies, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that a container holding the uranium fuel at the site has ruptured and is leaking.
 Dr Tony Moll found XDR-TB in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is "very high mortality, very difficult to deal with, and scary."
 Dr. Moll thought some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of them were healthy hospital workers.
 Over the course of a year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the proportion of total TB patients with XDR-TB is not very high. At any given time, there are 330,000 TB patients in South Africa, of which about 6,000 have XDR-TB.
 Weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, the two satellites collided at an altitude of 491 miles.
 Scientists say the explosion from the collision was huge.
 They are still studying the size of the impact and what effect it will have on the Earth.
 The Pentagon's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the analysis will be published on a public website.
 The mother of a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh was found dead in the trunk of his car Wednesday, and authorities in Ohio said they will charge him with aggravated murder.
 Dr. Malarvannan Balasubramaniam, 29, was found lying on the ground next to a road in the suburban area of Blue Ash, Ohio, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, wearing only a T-shirt and underwear and under the influence of drugs.
 She pointed to her black Oldsmobile Intri-G, which was 150 meters away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramanian, covered in blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of the season were reported in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then by mosquitoes to humans.
 The government has sent pig catchers to the affected areas, distributed thousands of mosquito nets and sprayed insecticides.
 The delivery of millions of doses of the vaccine, as promised by the government, will be a big help in the preparations of health agencies next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the hardest-hit areas of the world this year have been delayed by funding shortfalls and lower priorities than other diseases.
 Slaney moved to Sweden in 1956, and three years later he began working for the Swedish Postal Service, becoming its chief sculptor.
 He has produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 "His work is highly regarded for its quality and detail, and he is one of the few ""household names"" in the stamp business, with collectors specializing in his work. "
 His 1,000th stamp was a monumental work by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, 'The Achievements of the Kings of Sweden', which is listed in the Guinness Book of World Records.
 He also participated in the design of banknotes for other countries, including the portrait of the Prime Minister on the front of the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the incident, Gibson was taken to the hospital but died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the crash.
 The vehicle was moved from the crash site to Greenwich Mean Time on the same day at approximately 12:00.
 "One man working at a nearby garage said, 'The kids who were waiting to cross the street were all screaming and crying.'"
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to complete the funding for helping countries affected by global warming.
 That money could go toward flood-proofing homes, water resource management, and crop diversity.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to dismiss women's health concerns as a fad had backfired.
 She said she came to this conclusion because she was overwhelmed by positive comments and encouragement from women and men alike, urging that contraception should be considered a medical necessity.
 After the wounded were taken to hospital and the fighting stopped, about 40 inmates barricaded themselves in the prison yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to get the situation under control, but the prisoners' demands were not clear.
 Between 10 and 11 p.m. MDT (Mountain Daylight Time), prisoners started fires in the prison yard.
 Soon, police equipped with riot gear entered the yard and used tear gas to drive the inmates into a corner.
 Firefighters eventually extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal flooding that deposited sediment throughout the river was eliminated.
 These sediments are essential to the creation of sandbars and beaches that are used as wildlife habitats.
 As a result, two species of fish became extinct, and two others, including the humpback whale, were placed on the endangered species list.
 The flood will raise the water level by a few feet, but officials are hoping the sandbar will be restored.
 No tsunami warning was issued and the Jakarta Geophysics Institute said that a quake of magnitude 6.5 or less would not trigger a tsunami warning.
 Despite the lack of tsunami danger, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey was tearful in her farewell, she promised her fans she would be back.
 "This is not a farewell. This is the end of one chapter and the beginning of a new one."
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections show that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba has been re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also retained its majority in the parliamentary elections.
 The coalition and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it, and other coalition aircraft were also dispatched to provide support.
 The collision occurred at a high elevation in mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rugged terrain.
 The medical charity Médecins Sans Frontières, Doctors Without Borders, and the World Health Organization say the outbreak is the worst the country has seen.
 "Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Veerman said, "Angola is in the worst situation and the situation in Angola is still very bad."
 The game started at 10 a.m. in good weather, and except for a light drizzle in the morning, it was perfect for a seven-nation rugby tournament.
 Host nation South Africa, the top seed in the tournament, made a comfortable start by beating fifth-seeded Zambia 26-0.
 In the matches against the southern nations, South Africa was completely rusty, but as the tournament progressed, they improved steadily.
 Their well-trained defensive skills, ball handling skills and great teamwork made it obvious to everyone that the team would win.
 Officials in Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with fungus and is in danger of falling, posing a public health risk.
 It was due to be torn down on Tuesday but a court injunction has halted the demolition.
 All caves with the name "Seven Sisters" have entrances at least 100 to 250 metres (328 to 820 feet) in diameter.
 Infrared images show that the cave is likely to be a cave due to the temperature changes between day and night.
 "They are cooler during the day and warmer at night than the surrounding surface."
 "These thermal behaviors are not as stable as a large cave on Earth that maintains a constant temperature, but they match those of deep holes on the surface," said Glen Cushing, a member of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University's Flagstaff campus.
 Voting in France is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters are isolated in booths, and they put their preprinted ballots into envelopes.
 After the staff verify the voter's identity, the voter places the ballot in the ballot box and signs the poll book.
 French electoral law, on the contrary, rigorously codifies the procedure.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has been made transparent so that voters and observers can see that no other envelopes are present other than the one containing the ballot of a legitimate registered voter.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe the entire process of the election, and in the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision according to a specific procedure.
 Previously launched worldwide for cost-cutting and functionality, the ASUS Eee PC was the talk of the town at the Taipei IT Month in 2007.
 However, since ASUS received the 2007 Taiwan Sustainability Award from Taiwan's Minister of the Environment, Yang, the consumer market for notebook computers will be rapidly diversified and changed.
 The station's website describes the show as "a fresh, bold and irreverent take on the traditional radio theatre."
 Initially, the show was aired exclusively on TogiNet Radio, a site focused on talk radio and long-form internet radio.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established a subsidiary broadcasting station, AstroNet Radio.
 The show originally featured local amateurs from East Texas.
 With no law enforcement in the city of Bishkek, widespread looting was reported to have continued overnight.
 "One witness described people roaming the streets in groups and looting shops, describing Bishkek as 'lawless'."
 Some Bishkek residents blamed the illegal actions of southern protesters.
 South Africa won the Rugby Union Tri Nations match against the All Blacks (New Zealand) at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was 21–20, with the All Blacks winning their 15th consecutive match.
 The Springboks, meanwhile, have lost five games in a row.
 It was the final of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the series will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play Australia.
 Monday at 10:08 p.m. MDT, the storm hit western Montana.
 The US Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Center reported no immediate damage.
 The epicenter was about 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 A dead wild duck infected with the deadly bird flu virus H5N1, a variant of which is fatal to humans, was found in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France on Monday.
 France is the seventh country in Europe to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases suspected of being H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers has accused God of "the death, destruction and hundreds of millions of acts of terrorism" inflicted on "millions of earthlings".
 "The atheist Chamberlain claimed that his lawsuit was 'trivial' and that 'anyone can sue anyone else.'"
 "The story Camille Saint-Saens presented in the French opera is the story of an artist who lived a life dominated by love for drugs and Japan."
 As a result, performers are smoking marijuana and encouraging the audience to participate in the theater itself.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann were in fourth, fifth and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but he was harsher in his comments about Romney, who had run negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 "Perry said he would return to Texas to assess the results of tonight's meeting and determine whether there is a path forward for me in this election," he said, "but later he said he would stay in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21."
 After winning the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann announced that she would suspend her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 "According to what is known, he is in his 20s. In a statement, Beaver said, "Although I was not at the scene of the tragic incident and have no direct involvement, I offer my condolences and prayers to the families of the victims."
 The entertainment news website TMZ acknowledged that the photographer had parked his car across the street from the Sephora store and kept taking pictures of the police station before crossing the street, and that the California Highway Patrol had twice ordered him to move back.
 Police say the driver of the car that hit the photographer is unlikely to face criminal charges.
 Because only eighteen medals are awarded per day, many countries have not been able to reach the podium.
 Yesterday's Super-G included the 9th place of Anna Jochemsen of the Netherlands in the women's standing class, and the 10th place of Katja Saarinen of Finland in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Goliy took 11th place in the men's standing super-G, while Czech competitor Oldrich Zelynek finished 16th in the men's sitting super-G.
 Mexican gymnast Aly Raisman finished 15th in the women's all-around. New Zealand gymnast Adam Hall finished ninth in the men's all-around.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super G, while South Korea's Park Jong-seok was 24th in the men's sitting Super G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are under fire for allowing a disease outbreak to spread near their base camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not properly disinfected, allowing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the army came, Haiti had not had a health problem since 1800.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti cited an independent study that said Nepalese UN peacekeepers unintentionally spread the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantern, a UN health expert, said the sharp increase was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Mr. Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital had admitted a patient in stable condition.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where the Ebola virus outbreak has occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before The Simpsons, Simmons had worked in a variety of jobs in several different professions.
 In the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening with the production of The Simpsons, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing team.
 He left the pro ranks in 1993, but he kept his title as production manager, and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties every season.
 Earlier, China News Service reported that the passenger plane would be hijacked.
 According to subsequent reports, the plane was returning to Afghanistan after receiving a bomb threat and landed in Kandahar.
 Early reports said the plane was turned back to Afghanistan after refusing to land at Yurmani.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, both civilian and military, because of the country's aging fleet of aircraft, which are not well maintained.
 International sanctions meant that new aircraft purchases were impossible.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, an Iranian plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers, the worst aviation disaster in years.
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed off the runway at Maschad Airport, killing 17 people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the remaining shows on its tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After lead singer Steven Tyler fell off the stage during a concert on August 5, the tour was canceled.
 Murray was broken in the first set by both men serving their serves.
 Del Potro got the first break of the second set but needed another tie-break after it was 6-6.
 Portis has been receiving treatment for his shoulder injury, but he was able to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time (1500 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country sang the religious hymn, bhajan, in front of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanjay Chimmalgi opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Chowdhury. Chhappan bhog was also presented. Singer Raju Khandelwal was there with him.
 And, Laka Sing led the way in singing the Bajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (a Hindu offering of 56 different foods, fruits, nuts, and sweets) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Laka Sing also performed Chhapan Bajan. Singer Raju Khandelwal sang with Laka Sing.
 At a keynote presentation at the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the company's new Nintendo Revolution game console.
 The controller, which resembles a television remote control, uses two sensors located near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This allows players to move the device through the air and control its movements and motions.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car early in the race and had to retire.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was leading most of the race, but had to retire after a wheel nut came loose and he had to pit.
 Michael Schumacher was beaten by Alonso by a small margin, due to suspension damage caused by numerous collisions during the race.
 "According to the transcript of the press conference, Zhang said, 'She is very cute and sings pretty well.'"
 "I was deeply moved every time I rehearsed this work."
 About three minutes after launch, a large amount of insulation foam was seen falling away from the fuel tank in onboard camera footage.
 However, they are not thought to have caused damage to the space shuttle.
 "NASA's space shuttle program manager N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam insulation fell off after "the period of time we were concerned about."
 About five minutes after the fireworks started, the wind started to pick up. Then, about a minute later, the wind was blowing at 70 km/h. Then it started to rain, but it was so hard that it felt like needles on my skin. Then it started to hail. People were screaming and running around. It was crazy.
 "I lost my brother and his friend, and on the way I saw two disabled people in wheelchairs and people pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Company reported that there was no impact from the earthquake and that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 The 9,400 households in the area are said to live without water, and about 100 households without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and rail services were suspended in the affected areas, while Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport was closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Three more bombs exploded near the government building within two hours.
 Some reports say the official death toll is eight, while others say up to 30 people were injured, but the final death toll is not yet known.
 After ingesting contaminated pet food, urine samples from deceased pets were found to contain both cyanuric acid and melamine.
 The university researchers found that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the function of the kidneys.
 The researchers observed that the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid resulted in crystals forming in the cat's urine.
 The composition of these crystals is consistent with the crystals found in the urine of affected animals when compared to Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 You may not know, but most of the goods from Central America enter the country duty-free.
 Although 80 percent of our goods are taxed through tariffs from Central American countries, we treat you.
 That didn't seem fair to me. It wasn't fair.
 The message I have for you is to treat us the way we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a bill that bans the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 "The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a '18' rating and imposes a $1,000 fine for selling the games to minors."
 Attorney General, QC, Keir Starmer, announced this morning that Huhne and Pryce will both be charged.
 Hoon has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by Ed Davey, a member of parliament. Norman Lamb, a member of parliament, is budgeted to take over the business department when Davey leaves.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Olsen, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was wounded in the arm and jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider was injured in the face, requiring reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon missed the fifth man's head, but Schneider suffered persistent pain, lost one eye, had part of his skull removed and had his face rebuilt with titanium.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home at the USAF base.
 Carpanedo, in addition to the Wednesday event, also competed in two individual races in the championship.
 Her first event was the slalom, where she failed to make it past the first gate of 116 competitors, with 36 of them getting the same result.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she was 10th in a combined time of 4 minutes, 41.30 seconds, which was 2 minutes, 11.60 seconds slower than the winning time of Austria's Claudia Riegler and 1 minute, 9.20 seconds slower than Hungary's Gundi Mlinar.
 Four female skiers who sat in the women's section did not reach the finish line, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the competition race were eliminated from the race.
 Madia Pradeshi police recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 "D K Arya Deputy Superintendent of Police said, "Five persons who raped a Swiss woman have been arrested and also recovered the victim's mobile phone and laptop."
 The suspects are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the police superintendent, said the defendant came to court with his face covered.
 Three people were in the car when it crashed into the house, but none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the crash occurred was temporarily closed, and paramedics rescued the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first admitted to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is charged with the murder of his son in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is in custody awaiting trial, but because of her notoriety, witness testimony may be biased.
 This is common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scottish law is different and the court saw the publication of the photographs as potentially harmful.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, said: "If journalists publish pictures of suspects, they are walking a tightrope.
 The Crown Office, which deals with overall prosecutions, has indicated to journalists that there will be no further comment until after the prosecution.
 According to the leaked documents, the paper would have been based on the 1967 borders before the Middle East war and would have related to the border dispute that Palestinians want.
 According to reports, other topics include the future of the holy city of Jerusalem for both countries and the Jordan Valley issue.
 Israel demanded that the current troops in the area remain for 10 years, and the PA agreed that the troops would leave after five years.
 Hunters involved in the additional pest control trials were required to be closely supervised by forestry officers because they were monitoring and assessing the effectiveness of the trials.
 The partnership between NPWS and the Australian Sports Shooters Association saw the recruitment of qualified volunteers to assist with the Sports Shooters Association’s hunting program.
 According to Mike O'Flaherty, acting director of the Park Conservation and Heritage division of the NPWS, the four marksmen selected for the first shooting operation have all received comprehensive safety and training.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday for the nine-member provisional electoral council (CEP).
 Matelli is the fifth CEP in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the resignation of the former CEP as part of measures to prepare for new elections.
 The commission was set up in response to Martelly's reaction to the widespread anti-government protests that began in October.
 Some violent resistance movements were sparked by the fact that some elections were not held from 2011 onwards.
 About 60 cases of iPod overheating have been reported, resulting in six fires and four minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 accidents involving the equipment.
 Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported an additional 34 cases of overheating.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was "really regrettable" that Apple had postponed the release of its report.
 The quake struck the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT on Thursday).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Office of Homeland Security said no damage was reported on a national level.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a bus in the Philippine capital Manila and took tourists from Hong Kong hostage.
 Rolando Menéndez fired an M-16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and at least six people were confirmed dead.
 The six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early, along with the Filipino photographers.
 Later, when an elderly woman needed to use the bathroom, the photographers took her place. Mendoza was shot.
 Riggs followed in his father's footsteps and went into medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Donghan Riggs, who works in a hospital, began to investigate early labor in his free time.
 His research showed that when hormones were administered, the rate of lung maturation in the fetus was accelerated.
 Xinhua News Agency reported that government investigators recovered two flight data recorders, known as black boxes, on Wednesday.
 Other fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tammy Drymer said, "Luna was the Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. Luna left us on a full moon night. She was as special as she was strong.
 "Dustin 'Goldie' Runnels said, 'Luna was as weird as me... maybe even weirder... I'm going to miss her... I hope she's in a better place.'"
 A 2010 poll of 1,400 people conducted in the lead-up to the federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 Julia Gillard, the prime minister, has argued during the 2010 federal election campaign that Australia should become a republic when Queen Elizabeth II's reign ends.
 A poll found 34 percent want Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 In a poll, 29 percent of respondents thought Australia should become a republic quickly, while 31 percent of respondents said Australia should not become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medalist was scheduled to compete in the 100m and 200m freestyle and the Commonwealth Games relay, but his poor health was suspected due to his physical decline.
 The drugs needed to overcome the pain were banned in the competition, so he could not take them.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at Central Missouri State University, has discovered the largest known prime number as of January 25.
 Several people using various hardware and software have verified the discovery by the end of February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have delivered water to Earth along with the organic material that makes up proteins and sustains life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the Earth formed, because a comet collided with the Earth long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors "political chatter and nonsense."
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that will allow aircraft to fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 This is in contrast to the previous use of ground-based radar technology, which allowed air traffic controllers to identify aircraft with a much lower degree of accuracy, and provided pilots with less accurate information.
 At Wembley, there will be no additional transport provided or surface trains stopping, and there will be no on-site parking or public transport interchange parking.
 Concerns about the lack of public transportation have made it likely that the game will be played behind closed doors.
 A study published in the journal Science last Thursday announced that a new species of bird has formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Even though the researchers from Princeton University and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species evolved in just two generations, the process would have taken much longer because of the breeding between the local species, the Darwin finch, the medium ground finch and the finch that migrated from the outside, the large ground finch.
 Gold can be worked into all kinds of shapes. It can be rolled into very small shapes.
 It can be cut with a thin line, it can be bent or twisted, it can be beaten with a hammer or rolled with a sheet.
 "Gold can be made very thin and can be applied to other metals. It was used to decorate the hand-painted illustrations in books called "illuminated manuscripts."
 This is called the pH of the chemical, and you can make a scale using red cabbage juice.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline (alkaline) the chemical is.
 The pH level is expressed as the amount of hydrogen (H in pH) ions in a tested chemical.
 A hydrogen ion is a proton with an electron removed. (A hydrogen atom consists of a proton and an electron.)
 Together, dry two powders, then put them into the ball with wet clean hands after stirring.
 The moisture in your hands reacts with the outer layer to give a fun texture and forms a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had elaborate sewage systems and flush toilets connected to almost every house.
 Houses in the Greek islands of Santorini and Crete Minoan cities have been found to have sewage systems.
 Toilets existed in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In Roman civilization, the toilet was sometimes part of a public bathhouse, where men and women used the same facilities.
 If you're talking to someone thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 Satellites in space receive the signal and reflect it back almost immediately.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view.
 To put a satellite or telescope into space, you need a super-sized rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the most important being that it has given us a more convenient and faster means of transportation.
 It brought trains and cars and many other forms of transportation.
 Below them are medium-sized animals such as rabbits, hares, and deer, and medium-sized carnivores that hunt them.
 Finally, there are many more small cats (including pet cats) that eat much smaller prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their success is based on the concept of each cat's specialty, which prevents them from competing with other cats, and the concept of exploiting the gap.
 Lions are the most social of all the cats, living in groups.
 The group consists of 1-3 adult males and up to 30 females and their offspring.
 Females are closely related to each other because they are mostly from large families with many sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave in ways that are remarkably similar to those of a pride of lions (but different from other large canids), which is also deadly to prey.
 Tigers are like versatile athletes (they don't do it well, but) they can climb high, swim, jump long distances, and run five times faster than a human.
 Tigers are a social animal, living in groups of up to four. Only these four big cats can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is different from the roar of the lion, but it is similar to the phrase of the word that is roaring.
 Ocelots enjoy eating small animals, preferably ones that are much smaller than they are, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think that the otter uses its sense of smell to find and track prey.
 Ocelots are nocturnal, which means they are active at night and can see well in the dark. They are very stealthy and hunt their prey by sneaking up on it and covering it with their fur.
 When a small population of organisms becomes separated from the main group from which it originated (by moving to a mountain or river, or by being carried to a new island where it cannot easily move), they realize that they are in a different environment from the one they were in before.
 In these new environments, with different resources and competitors, new populations need different traits or adaptations to be competitive.
 The original population has not changed at all, but still needs to adapt as before.
 As time passed and new people began to adapt to the new environment, they began to look more and more different from the others.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two groups would look so different that they could not be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence of evolution and is a key part of evolution every week.
 Plants make the oxygen that humans breathe, and they take in the carbon dioxide (carbon-dioxide) that humans exhale.
 Plants use photosynthesis to make their own food, and also provide shade.
 We build houses out of wood and clothes out of plants. Most of the food we eat is vegetable. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 Mosasaurus was the top predator of its time, so there was nothing to fear except other mosasaurs.
 The long jaw was filled with more than 70 very sharp teeth, and there were additional teeth in the palate, meaning that no one could pass through without being bitten.
 It is not known for sure, but it may have had a forked tongue. It ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurids, and may have even eaten flesh.
 The animal attacked anything that came into the water, including the giant dinosaurs.
 Their food was mostly familiar to us, but among the Roman banquet fare were some unusual and strange things like wild boar, peacock, snails, and hibernating mice.
 Another difference was that the poor people and women sat on chairs and ate, while the rich men liked to sit together and have a feast, lying on their sides.
 Ancient Roman meals could not have included foods that came from the Americas or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they didn’t eat corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cocoa, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple to their god, which they called the "House of God."
 People would bring offerings to the gods, and priests would try to appease the gods' demands through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open temple courtyard and an inner sanctum that only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes special pyramid-shaped towers, called zigurats, were built to be part of a temple.
 The top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The life of the Hebrew family was almost entirely out of doors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were simply stalls on the street, and stones were used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled. In Norwegian sagas, they say that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder and sailed westward to discover Greenland and name it Greenland.
 Regardless of his discovery, the Eskimos were already living there at the time.
 Although each country was part of Scandinavia, the people of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland, their kings, customs, and history were very different.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the back of the Declaration of Independence is written with a treasure map.
 But that's not true. Even if there's something written on the back of the paper, it's not a treasure map.
 "The back of the Declaration of Independence has the words 'Original Declaration of Independence July 4th 1776' written on it, upside down and backwards."
 No one knows who wrote it, but the large parchment document (75.6 cm x 62.2 cm) was rolled up and stored early on.
 So it's likely that it was simply labeled.
 The D-Day landings and subsequent battles liberated northern France, but the south remained in German hands.
 "It was under the rule of Vichy France, which was a collaborationist regime with Germany, and they were the French who sided with the invaders rather than fighting them."
 "On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France, an operation called Operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces had liberated southern France and were turning their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a very large group of people who work and live together in cooperation, a single culture shared by a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, meaning "civil," "citizen," and "city," and defines the scale of a society.
 The city-states were the pioneers of the nation-state. Civilization is the transmission, over generations, of knowledge, the survival and equitable distribution of cultural legacies.
 Many cultures have disappeared without leaving significant historical evidence and are not treated as proper civilizations.
 During the War of Independence, the thirteen states formed a loose confederation under the Articles of Confederation, which gave each state a veto over most central government actions.
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and there was no national executive or judicial branch, so laws often had to be enforced by cooperative state authorities.
 Congress also had no power to repeal state taxes and tariffs.
 These amendments required unanimous consent of all states, and most state representatives, who ignored the central government, boycotted the meeting.
 The Italian national football team is the second most successful national team in the world, behind only Germany, and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, baseball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and F1 car racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and Italian athletes sometimes participate in international competitions or the Olympics.
 Japan has almost 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest island in the world!
 "The cluster of islands/army that Japan has, because of its geographical position, is often called the ""archipelago""."
 Taiwan began as a name given to the island by European sailors in the 15th century, who called it Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, which brought about a change in the production of grain, and hired Chinese laborers to produce rice and sugar through re-farming.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) army took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared Taiwan a territory of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 After losing the First Sino-Japanese War (1894–1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded Taiwan to Japan and gave Japan control of the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures, the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edge are reconstructed to allow tourists to better understand the original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu was restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world is 35 mm, which was the film size used primarily at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio has been inherited by digital camera image sensor formats.
 A little confusing, but the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format (the simplest integer ratio to get to 12) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (such as APS format) are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline for creating dynamic images while maintaining order.
 This law states that the most effective position for the main subject is where the lines that divide the image into thirds vertically and horizontally intersect.
 During this period of European history, the wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was thoroughly investigated.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity has bound European nations together despite differences in language and custom.
 Its pervasive power affects everyone from the king to the peasant.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's currency fund exists for that very reason.
 The church’s central power had been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and money raised questions about the legitimacy of the doctrine.
 Immediately after the outbreak of hostilities, the British begin a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although these blockades violated international law, which is generally accepted by several international conventions of the last two centuries, the strategy proved effective in blocking important military and civilian supplies.
 The British had mined the high seas to prevent any ship from entering any of the maritime zones, thus putting neutral ships at risk.
 Because the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response in an unrestricted submarine war.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing mood in most countries and among most citizens was pacifism and isolationism.
 Countries that had experienced the horrors of the First World War prayed that they would never again have to go through such a situation.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to work for Edison's company in New York City.
 He arrived in America with a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former employer, a copy of the Bible, and four cents in his pocket.
 In ancient China, there were different ways of indicating different eras, each dynasty or family in power was distinguished as a dynasty.
 There were also periods of disunity between the various dynasties, most notably the 60-year period between the Han and Jin dynasties, known as the Three Kingdoms period.
 During this period, there was a fierce war between many nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in battles to sit on the highest seat in the Xian palace.
 The use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, the rise of nationalism and the idea that the nation was the property of the people and not of a single ruler, all had a profound effect on society and politics.
 Also, after the revolution, jobs were open to all male applicants, opening the way for the most ambitious and success-oriented people to succeed.
 Because of the current ability-based ranking system, the same system is applied to the military.
 The French Revolution also inspired workers in other countries to revolt against their oppressors.
 Muhammad was deeply concerned with issues beyond this worldly life. He often used a cave known as Hira on Mount Noor (Light) for meditation.
 The cave, which has withstood the ravages of time, reveals Muhammad's religious inclinations very clearly.
 Located at the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, this cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if someone knows it exists, it's not easy to find it, because once you're inside the cave, you're completely isolated.
 The only thing you can see from the mountain is the clear blue sky. Inside the cave, you can't see or hear the outside world.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is one of the Seven Wonders of the World that still exist.
 Built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century BC, the Great Pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor the dead pharaohs.
 "The Giza Plateau, in the Egyptian Nile Valley, or ""Giza Necropolis"" contains several pyramids (the Great Pyramid being the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Sphinx."
 The pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Kufu and smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Kufu's wife and family.
 The "olympia" mark was V-shaped, and the "deme" mark was a square without a staple or bottom.
 Drawing is starting from the end of the bow and pulling the bow, and shooting is starting from the bowstring and releasing the bow.
 The upstroke usually makes a softer sound, while the downstroke makes a stronger, more confident sound.
 You may draw your own markings with a pencil, but the bow markings are for musical purposes and should usually be left alone.
 The terrified King Louis XVI, Queen Marie Antoinette and their two young children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles) and the king's sister, Princess Elizabeth, were forced to flee Versailles to Paris on October 6, 1789, by a mob of women workers.
 The king and queen rode back to Paris surrounded by a crowd that shouted and threatened them.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open their carriage windows.
 At one point a member of the mob waved the head of the murdered royalist captain in front of the terrified queen at the Palace of Versailles.
 The cost of the U.S. imperialist war to conquer the Philippines was paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial government to pay for a large part of their expenses, and bonds in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks attracted attention.
 Of course, the super-profits derived from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute the basic profit of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must know the background of the creation of the order.
 The period of time in which the events took place is usually referred to as the Middle Ages, which in European history refers to the period from the 11th to the 13th century (1000-1300 AD).
 The late Middle Ages, which preceded and followed the early Middle Ages, is conventionally considered to end around the year 1500.
 Technological determinism is a broad term encompassing a wide range of substantive ideas, from a technologically oriented or technological imperative to the more fundamental idea that human destiny is shaped by the manifestations of science and technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism have two concepts: that technological development itself has a greater influence than culture or politics, and that technology does not merely control society, but rather has a "substantial" influence on it.
 For example, someone might argue that cars have led to the development of roads.
 However, the national road network is not economically viable for a small number of cars, so new production methods are developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 Also, as more people own vehicles, the number of road accidents increases, which in turn leads to new technological advances in the medical field to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many elements of cultural determinism, influenced by writers such as Goethe, Pushkin, and Schlegel.
 From a romantic point of view, geography shaped individuals, and as time passed, the customs and cultures associated with that geography grew, and they were socially harmonious, and in the end, it was better than arbitrarily making and imposing laws.
 While Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern era, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 The reputation of the city as a center of luxury began in the 4th century and lasted until the 11th century.
 By the 12th century, Constantinople's prestige had declined, largely because the Crusaders returned with gifts such as silks and spices that were more valuable than the goods they sold in the Byzantine marketplace.
 At this time the fashion capital was changed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 In the beginning, the dress was greatly influenced by the Byzantine culture of the East.
 However, because of the slowness of information exchange, the Western style could be 25-30 years behind.
 Late medieval Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest developments of the time was the use of buttons to fasten clothes, as a result of the Crusades.
 Subsistence farming is farming that is carried out by farmers and their families to produce only as much food as they need.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, organic system that uses local varieties of seeds, which are rotated or otherwise manipulated to maximize yields.
 Historically, most farmers were subsistence farmers and still are in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together people who feel marginalized by society's standards and allow them to develop their own identities.
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location, and/or gender of the members.
 The defining characteristics of subculture are linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, and geographical, and may include any combination of these.
 Members of subcultures often express their sense of belonging through unique and symbolic styles that include fashion, manners, and specific slang.
 One of the most common ways of demonstrating the importance of socialization is to use the example of a few unfortunate children who, for reasons of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called "feral children". Some feral children are confined, often by their parents, who are unable to accept their child's severe intellectual or physical disabilities.
 Wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children are claimed to have been raised by animals, and some children are said to have lived in the wild by themselves.
 When raised entirely by nonhuman animals, wild infants behave as if they were animals that require almost exclusive special care, such as fear or indifference to humans.
 Project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and scaffolding takes it one step further.
 Scaffolding is more like an assistant than a method. It helps people learn new things, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 A metaphor can be both virtual and real, which means that the teacher is a metaphor for a form of scaffolding, but also a little paper clip human of Microsoft Office.
 The virtual structure is built into the software and is designed to prompt, raise and explain procedures that students might find difficult to handle on their own.
 The reasons why a child is placed in foster care are as varied as neglect, abuse, and even kidnapping.
 All children should grow up in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment, but that is not the case.
 We consider the foster care system to be a safe haven for these children.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, a caring foster parent, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 Foster care must be able to provide all the essential elements that were not met in the existing family.
 The Internet has both a collective communication and a communication between people.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to an additional dimension in terms of access and satisfaction.
 "For example, "learning" and "socialization" have been suggested as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 Amey and MacCord (1998) found that "personal involvement" and "continuing relationships" were new motivational aspects of the Web.
 By using video recordings, they were able to make important discoveries in the interpretation of the subtle facial expressions and movements that lasted only a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it claims to be able to detect whether a person is lying by accurately interpreting subtle facial expressions.
 Oliver Sacks wrote in his book "The President's Speech" that despite his brain damage, people accurately perceived the sincerity in his speech.
 He even suggested that dogs, too, have this ability to analyze human behavior.
 Twentieth-century research has shown that there are two hidden or apparent genetic variants.
 Mutations create new species genes, and selection removes expressed genes from the population.
 Separation and recombination shuffles the mutations that occur between each generation between the two gene pools.
 In the savannah, primates with human-like digestive systems have difficulty meeting their amino acid requirements from the available plant resources.
 In addition, the failure of this process leads to serious consequences - impaired growth, malnutrition, and eventually death.
 The most readily available plant-based sources are leaves or proteins from legumes and grains, but these are difficult for primates like us to digest without cooking.
 In contrast, animal foods such as ants, termites, and eggs provide high-quality protein with essential amino acids that are easily digested.
 "Given all the circumstances, it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the 'protein problem' in much the same way as the chimpanzees of the savannah do today."
 Sleep disruption is the process of intentionally waking up during a normal sleep period and then falling asleep again after a short period of time (10–60 minutes).
 This can be easily done by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up without fully rousing you.
 If you turn off your alarm clock while you sleep, you can put the clock in a far corner of the room so that you have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biological rhythm-based options include drinking large amounts of fluid (especially water or diuretics, which are known to induce urination) before bedtime and forcing oneself to urinate.
 The amount of equanimity a person possesses is related to the amount of insecurity that is inherent in his body and soul.
 The less you are tense, the more positive energy will come into your life. Everyone has the ability to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Anyone can achieve enlightenment; the only obstacle to this goal is our inner anxiety and negative tendencies.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded upon with many ideas from Mahayana Buddhism and Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism is, in theory, very simple: it consists of kundalini yoga, meditation, and the path of love that embraces all.
 When you do Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (the energy of enlightenment) awakens through the yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 At the heart of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse energy channels, activate chakras, and create enlightenment rituals.
 In World War II, Germany was a common enemy, which led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. The clash of systems, changes and cultures that followed the end of the war led to the decline of several countries.
 Two years later, the former allies were now enemies and the Cold War had begun.
 The Cold War would last for the next 40 years and become a real fight between proxy armies in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defences had already collapsed, and the only hope was to retreat along the Romanian bridgehead and regroup.
 However, these plans were rendered useless when more than 800,000 Soviet troops invaded eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international treaties (bilateral and multilateral) and entered the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts.
 Shipping goods by sea is the most efficient way to move large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 The Navy's mission is traditionally to transport people and goods, but also to prevent the enemy from doing so.
 One of the most notable recent examples is the North Atlantic Campaign of World War II, in which Americans tried to move men and resources across the Atlantic to help the British.
 At the same time, the German Navy, which used U-boats, tried to stop this operation.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would have been able to conquer the rest of Europe, including the United Kingdom.
 Goat farming is believed to have begun in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to keep them to make it easier to use milk, wool, meat and leather.
 Cattle goats are usually kept in herds on hills or in pastures, often under the care of a shepherd, usually a child or adolescent, who is better known as a goatherd. This method of pastoralism is still used today.
 The Machu Picchu road was built in England in the early 16th century.
 The macadam was made of parallel wooden planks, but it allowed horses to travel faster and carry more loads than the rougher roads of the time.
 Sleepers were introduced quite early to fix the track. However, it was found that the rails on iron sleepers were more efficient.
 This became a common practice, but iron wore out the wooden wheels of the chariots more quickly.
 As time passed, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels, and in 1767, the first railroad was introduced.
 The first known means of transportation for humans was walking, and with the appearance of Homo erectus 2 million years ago, humans began to walk upright.
 Their ancestors, Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright like them.
 Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as 7 million years ago, but the best-preserved evidence of bipedalism is in the fossils of Australopithecus, dating from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly lives, we can join environmental movements, and we can become activists to reduce the suffering we will experience in the future.
 This is similar to symptomatic treatment in many cases, but if you do not want to stop at a temporary solution, you need to find the source of the problem and disable that part.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot with the development of human science and technology, and the problem has become more serious because of the overpopulation and the luxurious lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson signed and hand-wrote a single copy, which was sent to the nearby printing shop of John Dunlap.
 That night, 150 to 200 copies of what is now called the Dunnlap Broadside were printed.
 On July 8, 1976, the document was read for the first time in front of the Independence Hall by John Nixon.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, and he read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 known surviving Dunlap broadsides are the oldest extant copies of the document; the handwritten originals no longer exist.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive today. We call them birds.
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many things that make birds look like dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, lay eggs, and walk on two legs like Tyrannosaurus.
 Most computers in use today use a method of manipulating information by encoding it in binary.
 Binary numbers can have only two values (either 0 or 1), and these numbers are called bits in computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not manifest itself immediately. Symptoms such as vomiting are so common that they cannot be diagnosed immediately.
 The most obvious sign of a poisoning is a container of medication or household chemicals left open.
 Check the table for specific emergency instructions for specific poisons.
 The term insect is used by entomologists to refer to this group of insects.
 The term is derived from the parasitic insect, the bedbug, which has been known since ancient times.
 The termites and carpenter ants are both chronic pests, adapting to their hosts' habitats and homes.
 The most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults, multiple sclerosis (MS) affects an estimated 400,000 people across the United States.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS) is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord, and nerves.
 Women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis, according to a new study.
 The couple may decide that it is not in the best interests of each other or the child to raise the baby.
 These couples may choose to adopt a baby.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main purpose of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which is actually how most scientific research is done.
 But an experiment is to eliminate one or more hypotheses, to ask questions and to lead to scientific research.
 Theologians and philosophers focused on classical texts and especially the Latin Bible.
 In science, including psychology, Aristotle's view of all matter was accepted.
 As knowledge of Greek declined, the West became disconnected from the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 Many of the rhythms observed in physiology and behavior depend critically on the existence of a biological clock and its production of endogenous cycles.
 Most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals, have a circadian rhythm, which is not simply a response to external cycles of light and dark, but is recorded in their genes.
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that can continue to run even when there are no signals coming from the outside.
 Hersh and Chase's experiment was one of the leading studies that suggested DNA was the genetic material.
 Hersh and Chase used phages, or viruses, to insert their DNA into the bacteria.
 They did two experiments: one to check for DNA in the pits when there was radioactive fallout, and one to check for protein in the pits when there was radioactive yellowcake.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects depending on the type of variation, the importance of the affected genetic segment, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Mutations in reproductive cells can only be passed on to offspring, and mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts people interested in nature walks for the purpose of viewing scenery, including plants and wild animals.
 Examples of field activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and research on parks and ecosystems.
 A trip to Borneo's Orangutan Island, photos, learning, etc. is one example.
 Every morning, people leave their small rural towns in their cars to go to work, passing by the offices of others who have just left.
 This dynamic transportation shuttle connects and supports everyone with a car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now, scientific data shows that this carbon economy, on a massive scale, has pushed the biosphere out of the stable state that helped human evolution for the last 20 million years.
 Everyone participates in society, uses the transportation system, and almost everyone complains about the transportation system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transport systems cause such frustration, and why do they so often fail to live up to expectations? Are transport engineers all incompetent? Or is something more fundamental at work?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles and the interactions they have with each other between two points.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study traffic flow because the driver's behavior cannot be predicted 100% of the time.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range, so traffic flow has a reasonable degree of consistency and can be roughly described mathematically.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, three key characteristics of flow, density, and speed are established between (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly in the air. The ability to fly helped insects to escape enemies more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back.
 This gives them a wider range of smaller places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are moths and flies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people believed that he was right about the solar system (and other stars) revolving around the Earth, but many did not.
 It seems like the earth is not moving, doesn't it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest river in the world by length and the largest by volume, carrying more than eight times the volume of water than the second longest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on Earth, sometimes reaching a width of 6 miles.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the rivers of the world into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main stem of the Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long, and the river basin is fed by thousands of tributaries.
 Pyramid building continued until the last moments of the Old Kingdom, but in size and technical excellence it never again equaled the pyramids of the Fourth Dynasty.
 The ancient Egyptians were amazed by the monumental buildings of their ancestors, which were more than 1,000 years old by their standards.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, the smallest independent state in the world and the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for legislative and official communications.
 Also, unlike Latin, which is used frequently in religious ceremonies, Italian is the everyday language spoken by most people working in the region.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, and copper since ancient times, because they are all found in nature in their natural form and are relatively easy to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that all matter was composed of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was similar to the four states of matter: solid, liquid, gas, and plasma (in that order), but Aristotle also theorized that they were transformed into new substances that made up what we see.
 An alloy is basically a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are a lot of elements on the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, as are the metals silver and gold.
 There are also alloys that contain some non-metals, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that there are trillions of them in the period at the end of this sentence.
 Thus, the pencil came into being and the pencil has remained a good tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, the advent of newer writing methods has led to less use of pencils, and pencils have been pushed to a less important position.
 Now people don’t need to get close to a pencil sharpener to write messages on a computer screen.
 People are wondering what the keyboard will look like if something new is created.
 Nuclear fission bombs are based on the principle that a large amount of energy is required to bring together a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It's like pulling a heavy wagon up a hill. When you split the nucleus again, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to split on their own, with very little outside influence or conditioning.
 "The surface of the Moon is made of rocks and dust, and the outer layer is called the crust."
 The crust is about 70 km thick near the surface and about 100 km thick at the bottom.
 The crust is thinner under Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 The crust is thinner, so there may be more maria near the surface, where it is easier for magma to rise.
 Content theories focus on what causes people to behave in a certain way or what causes them to behave in a certain way.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs or needs that are internalized until they become adults.
 These theories look at who certain people are and what in their environment makes them want to do certain things or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Typically, two behaviors can emerge as a manager begins to lead a former peer: they try to remain "one of the guys" at one end of the spectrum.
 Managers of this type are not well-liked when they make unpopular decisions, administer discipline, evaluate performance and assign responsibility, and have difficulty holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the team member becomes an unconscious individual who thinks that he or she must change everything that the team has been doing and make it his or her own.
 In the end, the team's success is the leader's responsibility.
 Such behavior causes confusion among the pack leader and the members.
 Virtual teams maintain the same standards of excellence as traditional teams, but with subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for the real members.
 They often have more autonomy than the existing team members because they can meet with teams at different times of the day that the local management team doesn't understand.
 "The existence of a true ""transparent team"" (Rason and Rapastos, 1989, 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team that each member reports to. This team sets the standards for each member.
 Why does it take so long for organizations to establish learning communities? One goal of putting the concept of organizational learning into practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are used efficiently in the organization's business units, creativity and originality can flourish.
 As a result, the process of overcoming obstacles together can lead to new innovative processes to meet customer needs.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create an innovation culture as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) describes a Continuum approach to helping organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide the material evidence needed when taking a theoretical approach to the study of cognitive abilities, narrowing the field of study and making it more precise.
 Correlations between brain pathology and behavior help scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, lesions, tumors, and other conditions can affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 New technologies have allowed us to observe and investigate brain structure and function in ways that were not possible before.
 This provides a lot of information and data for creating simulation models that help us understand the inner workings of the mind.
 AI conjures up images of science fiction, but it is a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of computers.
 AI research includes the study of automating tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 For example, handwriting, voice, and facial recognition, as well as control, planning, scheduling, and customer diagnostics and answering questions.
 These things became a separate discipline that focused on providing solutions to problems that arise in real life.
 AI systems are now being used frequently in the economic, medical, engineering and military fields, as seen in many home computers and video game software.
 Field trips are a big part of every class. Usually, teachers want to take their students to places that don't require a bus ride.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips, where students can see museum exhibits, visit an aquarium, or view beautiful works of art, all from the comfort of their classroom.
 Virtual field trips are a great way to reflect on field trips and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year Bennett High School students in North Carolina design a website about the state's capital, and each year the website is redesigned, with the previous version archived on an online server in the form of a scrapbook.
 Blogging also helps students improve their writing. Students often start blogs with poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of readers usually changes that.
 Since most students are the most critical audience, blog writers begin to try to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 "Blogs also encourage students to be more attentive to their surroundings" (Toto, 2004) by appealing to their need to be smart and interesting.
 Blogging is a tool that encourages collaboration and helps students extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 "The appropriate use of blogs is to "respond actively to Internet resources, thereby promoting the analytical and critical thinking of students and allowing them to define their own position in the writings of others and to establish their own perspective on a particular topic (Oravec, 2020)."
 Ottawa is Canada's charming capital city where two languages are spoken, and its diverse art galleries and museums illuminate Canada's past and present.
 In the south, there is Niagara Falls, and in the north, there are untouched natural beauties such as Muskoka.
 All these things make Ontario stand out as the true Canada to outsiders.
 The northern part of the country is sparsely populated, and some areas are almost uninhabited.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: African Americans living in the United States are more numerous than Canadians.
 The islands of East Africa lie along the east coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent or associated with France and are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 Islam was also introduced by Arabs, and there was a great change in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape Route from Europe to India.
 The north is bordered by Sahara, the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Female: All female travelers are encouraged to answer married, regardless of whether they are actually married.
 Wearing a ring can also help (but expensive rings are best avoided).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can result in what is perceived as harassment and that acts such as touching a woman's arm are not uncommon.
 Don't be afraid to say no to men and stick to your guns (cultural differences or not, harassment is not to be overlooked!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century by Berber fishermen and later used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and the Merinids.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it under the name of Casa Branca, but after the earthquake of 1755 they abandoned it.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city of Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish merchants who established a trading post here called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old Medina, you can easily find places selling traditional Moroccan products such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and a variety of other items, but all of them are for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, particularly the roads of the town, including the city center.
 Goma is quite safe, but if you are visiting Goma from outside, you should do some research to understand the ongoing conflict in North Kivu.
 The city is also the base for the cheapest mountain gorilla trekking in Africa and the Nyiragongo volcano climb.
 You can use a moto-taxi to get around Goma. The normal (local) price for a short ride is 500 Congolese francs.
 Combining the meaning of 'impossible to reach' with 'relative', 'Timbuktu' became a metaphor for a far-off, exotic place.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor village, but it has become a tourist destination because of its fame and has an airport.
 Due to the effects of desert sand, Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites in 1990.
 It was one of the most significant expeditions in Henry Louis Gates' PBS series "African American Lives."
 The city is more Arabic in character than African, and stands in marked contrast to the other cities of Mali.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeastern part of South Africa, bordered to the east by Mozambique, to the north by Zimbabwe, and to the south by the Crocodile River.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different zones, each supporting different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's flagship parks, and is home to some of the country's most famous wildlife.
 Like all South African national parks, there is a conservation fee and entrance fee to the park.
 It may be beneficial to purchase a Wild Card that allows you to enter specific parks in South Africa or the entire South African National Parks system.
 Hong Kong Island is the place where the name Hong Kong was given to the territory and is the main focus of many tourists.
 The skyline of Hong Kong is often compared to a string of pearls because of the way the buildings line up along the Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views in Hong Kong, leave Hong Kong Island and head to the Kowloon waterfront on the opposite side of the harbour.
 Most of Hong Kong's land reclamation has taken place along the northern coast.
 This is where British colonial developers made their mark, so if you're looking for evidence of the former colonial territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest contiguous mangrove forest, stretching 80 km (50 mi) from the coast of Bangladesh to the Sundarbans National Park in India.
 Sundarbans is a UNESCO World Heritage Site and a part of the forest within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 This forest is not just a simple mangrove swamp. It is part of the last remnants of the great jungle that once covered the Gangetic plains.
 The Sundarbans is 3,850 km² in area, of which about one-third is covered by water and tidal mudflats.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are currently 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the area.
 Buses run all day from the intercity bus station (across the river), but buses to the east and to Jakarta/Bandung only leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 The buses are often full, so it is best to buy a ticket in advance a few days before.
 In most areas, comfortable and sturdy minibus taxis are available.
 Shared taxis are a quick and comfortable way to travel to nearby areas, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the Oyapock River and the Brazilian city of Oiapoque with the French overseas department of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers are 83 m high, the bridge is 378 m long, and there are two 3.50 m wide lanes.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters, and construction was completed in August 2011, with the bridge closed to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to be fully operational in September 2017, when the construction of the Brazilian customs checkpoint is completed.
 The Guaraní are the most important indigenous group, living in eastern Paraguay, and were semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous groups such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, known as the "Land of the Guaraníes", was born in the 16th century as a result of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous people.
 The Spanish people began a three-century-long colonial era.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has maintained a considerable amount of its indigenous characteristics and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the Polo Grounds in Las Canitas.
 Smaller tournaments and matches are also held here at other times of the year.
 For tournament news and ticket information for polo matches, check out the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Pound (FKP), which is pegged to the British Pound (GBP) at a rate of 1:1.
 You can exchange money at the island's only bank, located right across from the FIC West store in Stanley.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands, and credit cards and US dollars are also widely accepted.
 In the affected areas, British and US currency are accepted, but credit cards are not. Please check with the owner in advance to determine what forms of payment are accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the Falkland Islands currency outside the islands, so exchange before you leave.
 Montevideo is located on the southern edge of the equator, so when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is a subtropical region, with temperatures usually above 30°C in summer.
 Winters can be unbelievably cold. Although days below freezing are rare, the combination of wind and humidity can make it feel colder than the actual temperature.
 There is no "wet season" or "dry season" as such; rainfall is almost constant throughout the year.
 Many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, but wild animals still have their wildness and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to park officials, you must be at least 100 yards/meters from bears and wolves, and 25 yards/meters from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may appear, elephants, elk, moose, bears, and almost all large animals can be dangerous.
 Dozens of visitors are injured every year for not keeping a proper distance from these animals, which are large, wild and dangerous, so keep a proper distance.
 Additionally, smells can attract bears and other wildlife, so you should avoid cooking or carrying smelly foods and keep your campsite clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, a village on the island of Upolu with a population of just over 40,000.
 Apia was established in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a famous naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the British ships sank, killing about 200 Americans and Germans.
 During the Mau movement, which was organised to fight for independence, a peaceful meeting in the village resulted in the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Because Auckland is bisected by two harbours, there are many beaches, the most popular of which are in three areas.
 North Shore Beach (North Harbour District) is located on the Pacific Ocean, stretching from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It is a safe swimming beach with almost all sandy beaches, and most of the beaches are shaded by pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is located at the Waitemata Harbour in the suburb of St Heliers, between Mission Bay and the central city of Auckland.
 These beaches are usually family-oriented and uncrowded, and there are many shops along the shore.
 The main local beer is Number One, which is not complex but a refreshing, light beer. Another local beer is Manta.
 There are many French wines to try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are also easily available.
 Local tap water is safe to drink, but bottled water is easily available if you are concerned.
 The concept of flat white is foreign to Australians, who have short blacks as espressos, cappuccinos with cream (not foam) and tea without milk.
 Hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juice is expensive but very tasty.
 I make many dives in this reef area throughout the year, but rarely see injuries from these causes on the reef.
 Still, you should listen to the advice of the officials and be careful to follow all the signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish occur from October to April, near beaches and estuaries, and occasionally are found outside these areas.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people. Most sharks are afraid of people and swim away.
 The sea crocodile does not live in the sea, but mainly inhabits the river mouths north of Rockhampton.
 By booking in advance, travelers have the peace of mind that there will be somewhere to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agents often have special deals on certain hotels, but you can also book other types of accommodation, such as camping sites, through them.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport pickup/transportation, and a cruise ship.
 We may also hold a reservation for you if you need time to decide or to obtain other documents (e.g. visa) for your destination.
 However, if there are any modifications or requests, please do not contact the hotel directly, but first contact the travel agency.
 At some festivals, many people who attend the music festival decide to camp on the site, and most attendees consider it a must-experience.
 To be close to the fun and excitement, you should get there early and get a campsite close to the music.
 Although the main stage may be over, don't forget that music can be played until late at night in many parts of the festival.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 When crossing the North Sea in winter, the ship passes through ice and makes quite a lot of noise, so it is better to check the location of the cabin.
 The St. Petersburg cruise includes time in the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (see terms and conditions).
 Casinos generally make every effort to maximize the time and money spent by their patrons; they usually have no windows or clocks, and may have one or more exits that are difficult to find.
 They keep visitors coming back by always having special food, drinks, and entertainment.
 Some places offer free drinks, but alcohol clouds judgment, so good gamblers know the importance of not getting drunk.
 If you are driving over high altitudes or mountain roads, you should consider the possibility of snow, ice, or sub-zero temperatures.
 On icy, snow-covered roads, the friction is reduced, so you can't drive as well as you would on a dry road.
 When a snowstorm hits, a lot of snow can fall in a short time, and your feet can get stuck.
 Also, falling or blowing snow, or rain, or condensation on the vehicle window may limit visibility.
 In contrast, many countries have winter roads, where ice and snow are common, and roads are not blocked for most of the year.
 The safari is probably the most spectacular tourist attraction in Africa and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari is widely used to describe overland travel in Africa, especially in the savannah, to view wild animals in their natural habitat.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars and can be observed well using standard equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs, and leopards are sometimes shy, so binoculars can help you see them better.
 "Hiking safari ("Bushwalking", "Hiking safari" or "Walking safari") is a form of hiking that consists of several hours or days of walking."
 The Paralympic Games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in various locations across Japan.
 Tokyo, which hosted the 1964 Summer Olympics, will be the only city in Asia to have hosted the Summer Games twice.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement, you may be in a bit of a pickle.
 Refund policies vary, but as of the end of March, most coronavirus-related cancellation policies do not extend beyond the 2020 Olympics.
 Most event tickets are priced between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, and the average ticket price is around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels have irons and ironing boards available for guests to use, even if they are not provided in the room.
 You may not have an iron or like to wear ironed socks, in which case there is a way to use a hair dryer.
 Be careful not to overheat the fabric (it may shrink or stain).
 There are other ways to purify water, some of which are more effective at removing certain contaminants.
 In some areas, one minute of boiling is enough, while in others, it may take several minutes.
 Water filters vary in effectiveness, and in areas of concern, it is recommended to drink bottled water from a reputable brand.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not common in their own region.
 Pests can make food go bad, cause inflammation or, worse, trigger allergic reactions, spread toxins or carry disease.
 Diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people by force, are usually not considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping provides an opportunity to purchase goods that are exempt from taxes and consumption taxes in certain areas.
 Travelers from countries with high taxes can sometimes save a significant amount of money, especially when buying alcohol or cigarettes.
 The road between Point Marion and Fairmont, located in a remote mountainous area, is known as one of the most difficult roads to drive on the entire Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway.
 If you are not used to driving in the countryside, beware of steep slopes, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower than on the previous and subsequent sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) - and compliance with it is much more important within the section than on other sections.
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at many other points along this route, such as at Wise, Pennsylvania.
 German pastries are pretty good, and in Bavaria, they are similar to their southern neighbors in Austria, with lots of butter and variety.
 Fruit pastries are common, with apples being used in pastries all year round, and cherries and plums being used mostly in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. Popular cakes are especially well suited to strong coffee.
 If you want a small, flavorful bread, try a local version of the baguette, pan brioche, or krapfen.
 Curry is a dish that is based on medicinal plants and spices, and is accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 "Curry can be ""thick"" or ""thin"" depending on the amount of water used."
 In the northern Indian and Pakistani interior, yogurt is commonly used in curries. In southern India and other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 When you think of Indonesian food, you think of the entire country, with its 17,000 islands and a wide variety of regional cuisines.
 However, when used without restriction, the term tends to refer to the food of the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, the cuisine of Java is characterized by a variety of simple seasonal dishes, and the main flavors favored by the Javanese are peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar), and a variety of spices.
 The backrest is a support for the rider's feet, placed on either side of the saddle.
 This device gives the rider much more stability, but it can be a safety issue because the feet can get caught.
 If a person riding a horse falls off and gets their foot caught in the stirrup, the horse may run away, dragging the person along. There are several safety precautions that can be taken to minimize this risk.
 First, most riders wear boots that have heels and a narrow, smooth sole.
 Next, some saddles, particularly those in the UK, have a safety strap that can be released if the falling rider pulls the reins back.
 Cochamó Valley - Known as the Yosemite Valley of South America, Cochamó Valley is Chile's premier climbing destination, with a variety of large granite walls and rocky peaks.
 The mountain top has a breathtaking view from the mountain peak. Mountaineers from all over the world come here to seek new paths in the nature with unlimited potential.
 Ski and snowboarding are popular sports that involve sliding down snow-covered terrain with skis or a snowboard attached to your feet.
 "Skiing is a form of recreation enjoyed by skiers, called ski bums, who plan their vacations around skiing."
 The idea of skiing is very old. Cave paintings depicting skiers date back to 5,000 B.C.
 Skiing as a sport dates back at least to the 17th century, and the first recreational ski club was established in 1861 by Norwegians in Australia.
 Skiing Backpacking: This activity is also known as backcountry skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing and mountaineering, but usually does not include them, and in the latter case is practiced on steep terrain and requires much harder skis and boots.
 Think of ski runs as similar to hiking trails.
 In good conditions, you can go a little further than walking, but without well-maintained tracks and heavy backpacks, you will not reach the speed of cross-country skiing.
 Europe is a continent with relatively few independent countries, but many of them, so traveling between them usually means going through visa applications and passport checks several times.
 But the Schengen zone acts somewhat like a country in this respect.
 While in this zone, you can generally cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, having a Schengen visa means that you do not need to apply for a visa individually to each Schengen country, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of antiques. In some countries, products that are over 100 years old are considered antiques.
 Compared to Europe, North America has a geographical difference that shows a shorter age of defining antiques.
 Craft products may not be as durable as mass-produced counterparts, but they can still be defined as antiques.
 Reindeer husbandry is one of the Sami's important livelihoods and in trade, such culture also has important meaning for other practitioners.
 Traditionally, not all Sámi have been involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, but most have lived by herding reindeer as draught animals, supplementing their income with fishing and hunting.
 Today, many Sami people are involved in modern trade. Tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sápmi.
 It is widely used among non-Roma, but is often considered offensive by Roma, because of its negative connotations and inaccurate perceptions of Roma people.
 If the country you are visiting becomes a travel alert area, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You may want to hear the government's opinion rather than your own, but the advice of each country's government is tailored to its own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may find themselves in a different situation than Europeans or Arabs.
 The alert is just a brief summary of a country's political situation.
 The views presented are largely superficial, general, and overly simplified in comparison with the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Adverse weather is a general term for dangerous weather phenomena that can cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of life.
 Adverse weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types depending on the region, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Wind, hail, excessive precipitation, and wildfires are forms and effects of adverse weather.
 Local and seasonal adverse weather phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, dust storms, and sandstorms.
 Travelers should look up the local weather beforehand to avoid any hitches in their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country considered a combat zone should be sure to receive professional training.
 An Internet search for 'hostile environment courses' will probably give you a local company address.
 The lectures usually cover much more detail on all the topics discussed here, and are usually accompanied by practical experience.
 The course usually lasts 2-5 days and involves role-playing, various first aid techniques, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about wild survival are common, but publications about war zones are rare.
 Travelers planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documentation when they return.
 Whether to issue passports with gender-neutral (X) or to update documents according to the name and gender requested varies from country to country.
 The willingness of foreign governments to accept these documents is also very variable.
 In the post-9/11 era, security screening has become even more of a hassle.
 Transgender people before surgery should not expect to pass through the scanner with their privacy and dignity intact.
 Rip currents are a type of ocean current that often occurs at beaches, where waves break on a reef or other obstruction and return as a rip current.
 Due to the systematic classification in the underwater system, the reducing water is concentrated in some deep places, and this can form from rapid current to deep water.
 Most of them die from exhaustion after trying to swim against the current, which is often impossible.
 If you get out of the current, it's not that hard to swim back to shore.
 You may want to look for a place where you won't get caught in the current again, or you may want to wait for rescue depending on your swimming ability or whether you were spotted by someone else.
 Culture shock is faster, longer lasting, and more intense than culture shock because there is no honeymoon phase.
 Travelers who have not had difficulty adjusting to a new culture often have a particularly difficult time adjusting to their native culture again.
 When returning home after living abroad, they may lose some of their cultural habits while adapting to the culture of the country they are returning to.
 When you first went abroad, most people were patient and understanding because they knew you were adjusting to a new country.
 People may not think that patience and understanding are needed for travelers returning home.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see the pyramids in the quiet before the show starts.
 You will always hear the sounds of tourists and vendors. The story of light and sound is like a storybook.
 The Sphinx is set up as the background and narrator of the long story.
 The scenes were projected on the pyramids and the other pyramids were lit up.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most bases of any area in 2020, with 16 countries operating there.
 The islands are located about 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula, the largest of which is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Other highlights include Livingston Island and Deception Island, which are still active volcanoes and offer spectacular natural harbours filled with water.
 Ellesmere Island is located on the southern tip of the peninsula and is bordered by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains here are a continuation of the highlands, then re-emerge to form a 220-mile-long belt of the Elysian Mountains, which are bisected by the Minnesota glacier.
 In the north or the Centennial Mountains is the highest mountain in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which is 4,892 m high.
 If you are in a remote area where your cell phone does not have coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones cannot usually replace cell phones because they must be used outdoors where a satellite and a radio link are in direct line of sight.
 The service is frequently used for maritime transportation, including pleasure craft, and for where voice and data services are required.
 You will receive more information from your local telecommunications service provider about this service connection.
 People who use Gap Year for travel and study are increasing.
 This is especially popular with graduates, who can take a year out of their studies without it counting against them.
 In most cases, enrolling on a gap-year course abroad will actually increase your chances of getting into higher education back home.
 Generally, there is a fee to enroll in these educational programs.
 "Finland is a great place to enjoy boating. "The Land of a thousand lakes" has thousands of lakes and thousands of islands on its coastal archipelago."
 In the archipelago and the lake, you do not need a yacht.
 Although the coastal islands and large lakes are big enough for any yacht, it is also an interesting experience to take a smaller boat or even a kayak.
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with one boat per seven to eight people.
 This is similar to what has happened in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is quite unusual in other countries (New Zealand has one for every 40 people).
 Certainly, most Baltic cruises offer an extended stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can spend a couple of days exploring the historic city and then return to your cruise ship for a night's sleep.
 If you are going to the coast on a cruise, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruises advertise Berlin, Germany, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is not near the water, and visiting the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be a scary experience for anyone, regardless of age or gender, but it can be especially traumatic for those who have never flown before or are afraid of flying.
 It is nothing to be ashamed of, and is no different from the personal fears, disgusts, and prejudices that most people have about other things.
 For some people, understanding how an airplane works and what happens during a flight can help overcome fears based on ignorance or a sense of being out of control.
 Courier companies are paid a lot of money to deliver goods quickly, and often time is of the essence for business documents, emergency repairs or spare parts.
 Large companies use their own aircraft on some routes, but for other routes or small companies, there is a problem.
 If you sent it by air freight, it may take several days to clear customs on some routes.
 The only way to get it processed faster was to send it as checked baggage, which airline regulations do not allow without a passenger on board.
 The only sure way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money to enjoy the privilege (or have your company pay for you).
 So it's not cheap, but it's not too bad either: you could pay up to 4 times the price of a business class ticket or up to 11 times the price of a first class ticket!
 Generally, direct flights from Area A to Area B are not worth the effort to try to get a seat discount, whether it is in Business or First Class.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of getting somewhere fast and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the language is Romanian, although Russian is widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered from ethnic strife.
 The conflict in 1994 resulted in the Transnistria Republic, a self-proclaimed state in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Although political negotiations between the two Moldovas failed, economic relations were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is Eastern Orthodoxy.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million and is the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 Once an ancient city, Smirna is now a modern, developed, bustling commercial center surrounded by mountains and a huge bay.
 The city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey, but among the wide boulevards, modern shopping centers, and glass-fronted buildings are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets, and old mosques and churches.
 From Haldarsvik village you can see the nearby island of Eysturoy, and there is an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard there are some interesting marble carvings of doves on some of the tombs.
 It is worth spending 30 minutes to walk around this interesting village.
 To the north is the romantic and enchanting town of Sintra, a city famous with foreigners for its magnificence, which was praised by Byron.
 Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, to the north is the world-famous Shrine of Fatima, where the Virgin Mary appeared.
 Remember that this is basically a huge cemetery and a place of great significance to a large part of the world's population that is almost impossible to calculate.
 There are still many people living here, and many more who were killed here or died in the work camps. Jews, and non-Jews.
 Please show respect, solemnity and deference to this place. Please do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not scratch or deface the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Half of the population prefers to use Catalan, and the majority understands it, and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, the official language established by law.
 However, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, but during unplanned service interruptions, the automatic system broadcasts in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude, and arrogant.
 "This is usually a false stereotype, but the best way to live in Paris is still to behave like a ""bien élevé"" person, which will make your life easier."
 The Parisians' brusque exterior will quickly disappear if you show them basic courtesy.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is mostly covered by dense forests of beech, hornbeam, pine and Alpine and Mediterranean plants.
 The wide range of microclimates, different soils and altitudes result in a wide range of plant communities.
 The area is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, rare animals such as the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, snake, fox and large hare are found together with many more common species.
 During a visit to the monastery, women must wear skirts that cover their knees and shoulders must be covered.
 Most monasteries will provide a cover that can be draped over the shoulders for women visitors who have not brought their own, but if you bring a brightly colored cover with you, you will be greeted with a smile at the entrance by the monk or nun.
 Along the same lines, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 You can rent them at the entrance, but since they are not washed every time they are used, it may be uncomfortable to wear such a kimono. You can wear it for all men in one size!
 Like the food of the Mediterranean, the food of Mallorca is based on bread, vegetables, meat (especially pork) and olive oil.
 A simple, yet particularly popular summer dinner is pâté en croûte, bread with cheese, tuna, or other easily available ingredients, such as tomatoes and olive oil.
 All nouns that are used with the word Sie, meaning you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and nouns.
 It is a bit complicated to find out whether a verb or adjective is used in the form of a noun phrase, but it is definitely easier to read.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch out for are c and g, as they change depending on the vowel that follows.
 Also, you have to pronounce r and rr differently. Caro means dear, but carro means cart.
 Persian is relatively easy and has a mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar primer will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and better understand the phrases.
 It goes without saying that if you know Romance languages, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who know a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is so similar to Spanish that it doesn’t need to be studied separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are mostly obsolete today and are used as museums or educational sites.
 Their era did not have the same level of light pollution as today, so they were located in places that were easily accessible, such as cities and campuses, unlike today's observatories.
 Most modern research telescopes are large facilities located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The cherry blossom viewing event, known as Hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 This concept comes from China, where the plum blossom is chosen as a part of culture.
 The first cherry blossom party in Japan was held in the Imperial Palace, and only the Emperor and members of the aristocracy attended.
 "Plants look so good in their natural environment that the temptation to take just one specimen is great, but it should be resisted."
 "If you visit a formally laid-out garden and collect 'specimens', you will be driven out without a doubt."
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, very easy to get around, and you can buy almost anything after you arrive.
 "But if you're in the ""hot"" zone, a few degrees north of the equator, you'll have to deal with high temperatures (always) and strong sun (rarely, when the sky is clear)."
 There are also buses to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you want to take is not going to Kiryat Arba, the Jewish settlement near Hebron, but to Hebron itself.
 Inland waterways can be a great subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley or take a cruise on the Danube to interesting places along the river.
 They also set up popular hiking and cycling courses.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions surrounding the holiday have become universalized to non-Christians and non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night on Easter Eve to watch the sunrise.
 Of course, there is a Christian theological explanation for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian spring and harvest ritual.
 More traditional churches hold Easter Vigils on Saturday nights of Holy Week, where the faithful often celebrate the Resurrection at midnight.
 All the animals that first arrived on the island either swam, flew, or arrived on the island floating on the water.
 Mammals were unable to travel as far as the mainland, as the giant tortoises of Galapagos are primary herbivores.
 Since humans arrived on the Galapagos, many mammals, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs, have been introduced to the islands.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 The sky is dark all day, so it is a good opportunity to see the aurora.
 The area is sparsely populated, so light pollution is not a problem, and it is possible to enjoy the stars in the night sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than Westerners.
 Suits are the standard for business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by their first names or titles.
 In the workplace, teamwork is so important that it emphasizes the collective effort over individual achievement.
 Workers must get the approval of their supervisor for any decision they make and must follow their supervisor's instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.30281557756434535, 'precisions': [0.6391765491899115, 0.37399720962678756, 0.24393358876117496, 0.16406847742922723], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9682371136495782, 'length_ratio': 0.9687310383884147, 'translation_length': 23948, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 58.18629940282871, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8799692294578778, 'scores': [0.7569947838783264, 0.8982755541801453, 0.8935863375663757, 0.8128568530082703, 0.8970404267311096, 0.8088143467903137, 0.9157707691192627, 0.9110494256019592, 0.9469655156135559, 0.9512137174606323, 0.9096115827560425, 0.9029726982116699, 0.9466878175735474, 0.8761116862297058, 0.8720166087150574, 0.8272749781608582, 0.9074668884277344, 0.9262248277664185, 0.9286012053489685, 0.8747593760490417, 0.935894787311554, 0.9241247773170471, 0.8700849413871765, 0.8825810551643372, 0.8790949583053589, 0.9305487275123596, 0.8845587968826294, 0.8968804478645325, 0.8398486971855164, 0.9377833008766174, 0.8266909122467041, 0.8402169942855835, 0.8056835532188416, 0.9193950295448303, 0.9371969103813171, 0.8571102619171143, 0.8210562467575073, 0.903533399105072, 0.8754895329475403, 0.8696050047874451, 0.8453733325004578, 0.9348408579826355, 0.9133644700050354, 0.8995406031608582, 0.8264322876930237, 0.8698565363883972, 0.8915354609489441, 0.9264221787452698, 0.9190542697906494, 0.8831711411476135, 0.8578183054924011, 0.9070642590522766, 0.9106348156929016, 0.9395898580551147, 0.8792108297348022, 0.8660882115364075, 0.8451930284500122, 0.8805338144302368, 0.9040289521217346, 0.920747697353363, 0.8770731091499329, 0.8929402232170105, 0.8342776894569397, 0.911001980304718, 0.8894453644752502, 0.8585222363471985, 0.869361937046051, 0.8359794020652771, 0.9182395339012146, 0.9163126349449158, 0.8917266726493835, 0.8885335922241211, 0.8418894410133362, 0.8589065670967102, 0.9049045443534851, 0.8074883818626404, 0.8920558094978333, 0.9190905690193176, 0.9523162245750427, 0.9039589762687683, 0.8899779319763184, 0.8784887194633484, 0.8892355561256409, 0.8446887731552124, 0.8630353808403015, 0.9062971472740173, 0.8334409594535828, 0.8846409320831299, 0.8625383973121643, 0.8837420344352722, 0.873879611492157, 0.9035327434539795, 0.8905563950538635, 0.9455766677856445, 0.9411661028862, 0.9308356642723083, 0.935343325138092, 0.6652624011039734, 0.889802873134613, 0.8540632128715515, 0.9283023476600647, 0.8289545178413391, 0.8870965838432312, 0.9448842406272888, 0.8889343738555908, 0.8176724910736084, 0.9059826731681824, 0.886779248714447, 0.8777044415473938, 0.8079423308372498, 0.9309253096580505, 0.9317670464515686, 0.9338129162788391, 0.9123498201370239, 0.8449216485023499, 0.8191657066345215, 0.8665408492088318, 0.8943962454795837, 0.9640025496482849, 0.8564793467521667, 0.8817780613899231, 0.8760085701942444, 0.9189758896827698, 0.9205158948898315, 0.7255205512046814, 0.887795627117157, 0.8271203637123108, 0.8947622179985046, 0.8653873801231384, 0.9382892847061157, 0.8179954290390015, 0.8957460522651672, 0.9025583863258362, 0.9393027424812317, 0.7985478043556213, 0.9077897667884827, 0.9085070490837097, 0.9226352572441101, 0.9294422268867493, 0.885065495967865, 0.8643287420272827, 0.8692800402641296, 0.9384684562683105, 0.9367913007736206, 0.9228150248527527, 0.9244350790977478, 0.9454047679901123, 0.9150070548057556, 0.8925004601478577, 0.923431396484375, 0.8904274106025696, 0.7931948900222778, 0.8343409895896912, 0.860159158706665, 0.8672991394996643, 0.88515305519104, 0.8966383934020996, 0.8104454874992371, 0.9164462685585022, 0.8310034275054932, 0.9379417300224304, 0.8520785570144653, 0.8726969957351685, 0.9040918946266174, 0.8904665112495422, 0.8399246335029602, 0.9013750553131104, 0.8680564761161804, 0.8305037617683411, 0.8806247115135193, 0.8931721448898315, 0.9408422112464905, 0.9025285243988037, 0.879729688167572, 0.8226611018180847, 0.9105867743492126, 0.8664121031761169, 0.8611711859703064, 0.8525442481040955, 0.8942439556121826, 0.9373744130134583, 0.7019979953765869, 0.8883857131004333, 0.8719044327735901, 0.9000189900398254, 0.9206125140190125, 0.946512758731842, 0.834269642829895, 0.8796882033348083, 0.8656592965126038, 0.8306909203529358, 0.9123985171318054, 0.8691097497940063, 0.8761571645736694, 0.8921732306480408, 0.9472825527191162, 0.8485109806060791, 0.8281580209732056, 0.9284599423408508, 0.8896181583404541, 0.8173745274543762, 0.886920690536499, 0.8172954320907593, 0.84757000207901, 0.8846619725227356, 0.9169216156005859, 0.854044497013092, 0.886427104473114, 0.8326645493507385, 0.9309914708137512, 0.9229945540428162, 0.9165931344032288, 0.8644107580184937, 0.9347979426383972, 0.9418898224830627, 0.892999529838562, 0.876970112323761, 0.8944107294082642, 0.8725535273551941, 0.8975760340690613, 0.9567083120346069, 0.9166334271430969, 0.8932536840438843, 0.8548843264579773, 0.9198973774909973, 0.9423762559890747, 0.8883581757545471, 0.6351155042648315, 0.8589584231376648, 0.8600276112556458, 0.9623924493789673, 0.8441148400306702, 0.8243085741996765, 0.6992322206497192, 0.843003511428833, 0.7300509810447693, 0.907351016998291, 0.92005854845047, 0.880226731300354, 0.9008823037147522, 0.8048412203788757, 0.781718909740448, 0.873950183391571, 0.9017882347106934, 0.8952974677085876, 0.9402276873588562, 0.8291148543357849, 0.8311635255813599, 0.8687141537666321, 0.9391108751296997, 0.9147008657455444, 0.8976658582687378, 0.9080926179885864, 0.9353589415550232, 0.9458103179931641, 0.923356294631958, 0.8919321894645691, 0.9273379445075989, 0.918400764465332, 0.8733302354812622, 0.9047131538391113, 0.8703158497810364, 0.8927214741706848, 0.8823384642601013, 0.9314417839050293, 0.9020991921424866, 0.819320023059845, 0.8193332552909851, 0.942080557346344, 0.8984572291374207, 0.8776367902755737, 0.8464695811271667, 0.9296479821205139, 0.8798878192901611, 0.7929205894470215, 0.7956785559654236, 0.8517683744430542, 0.9035332798957825, 0.8741230368614197, 0.9169164896011353, 0.9023664593696594, 0.9046549797058105, 0.9377285838127136, 0.8944056630134583, 0.9245762228965759, 0.9414307475090027, 0.8772870302200317, 0.8397060632705688, 0.9162787795066833, 0.840203583240509, 0.8967750668525696, 0.8500553369522095, 0.8779566884040833, 0.8520054221153259, 0.8642862439155579, 0.8802161812782288, 0.8914696574211121, 0.890631377696991, 0.812450110912323, 0.8963785171508789, 0.9254160523414612, 0.8748922944068909, 0.9054564237594604, 0.9108958840370178, 0.7733778357505798, 0.8491694927215576, 0.9013904333114624, 0.8015701770782471, 0.9241308569908142, 0.9070038199424744, 0.9108175039291382, 0.9168753623962402, 0.92724609375, 0.7951287627220154, 0.9400689601898193, 0.9232640266418457, 0.791317880153656, 0.8945415616035461, 0.9047736525535583, 0.9336422681808472, 0.826147198677063, 0.8745185732841492, 0.8804501295089722, 0.8910079598426819, 0.9005817174911499, 0.8768331408500671, 0.8465457558631897, 0.8595407605171204, 0.9195308089256287, 0.9245136380195618, 0.9046456217765808, 0.9343299269676208, 0.9453079104423523, 0.9317412972450256, 0.9497645497322083, 0.9242319464683533, 0.8608893752098083, 0.8407614827156067, 0.8575835824012756, 0.8938723206520081, 0.7899523377418518, 0.9303115606307983, 0.7450301051139832, 0.8581833243370056, 0.9105355143547058, 0.9075771570205688, 0.9153911471366882, 0.8407353162765503, 0.8095990419387817, 0.8714921474456787, 0.9014788269996643, 0.7783598303794861, 0.9018633961677551, 0.9080491662025452, 0.9005730748176575, 0.9103954434394836, 0.9032614231109619, 0.8906657695770264, 0.8875800967216492, 0.7690480947494507, 0.877364993095398, 0.8211914300918579, 0.8983057141304016, 0.8138061165809631, 0.8942297101020813, 0.7612718939781189, 0.7966853976249695, 0.7002857327461243, 0.7467008233070374, 0.8311103582382202, 0.8006552457809448, 0.7977891564369202, 0.8564264178276062, 0.8712106347084045, 0.8908994793891907, 0.8820751309394836, 0.9299419522285461, 0.8832228183746338, 0.854158341884613, 0.9201632738113403, 0.9004729390144348, 0.8891575932502747, 0.7898781895637512, 0.8514286279678345, 0.8493946194648743, 0.8436412811279297, 0.8076589703559875, 0.9226953983306885, 0.9202319979667664, 0.8571884036064148, 0.9033104181289673, 0.9321718811988831, 0.9161858558654785, 0.832732081413269, 0.971091091632843, 0.7792099118232727, 0.8539096713066101, 0.9574399590492249, 0.8752134442329407, 0.9298862218856812, 0.8982642292976379, 0.9002824425697327, 0.8965145945549011, 0.8202847838401794, 0.8003692626953125, 0.7572369575500488, 0.9054231643676758, 0.8294375538825989, 0.9149568676948547, 0.8882764577865601, 0.8881466388702393, 0.8467576503753662, 0.8379620313644409, 0.903462290763855, 0.8447014689445496, 0.881521999835968, 0.8722923398017883, 0.8550288081169128, 0.9092884659767151, 0.9432880282402039, 0.9308669567108154, 0.9314119219779968, 0.8011210560798645, 0.8089858889579773, 0.862989068031311, 0.9198387265205383, 0.8957582116127014, 0.9152799248695374, 0.8879653811454773, 0.9371301531791687, 0.9229708909988403, 0.9341445565223694, 0.8961647152900696, 0.8463857769966125, 0.8763155937194824, 0.8818672299385071, 0.8663952350616455, 0.8624926209449768, 0.928095281124115, 0.8974105715751648, 0.8905110955238342, 0.9078733325004578, 0.9426904320716858, 0.9081560969352722, 0.8522207140922546, 0.9100416302680969, 0.911691427230835, 0.8404180407524109, 0.8985469937324524, 0.7657352089881897, 0.8652816414833069, 0.8599622845649719, 0.9354106783866882, 0.9000702500343323, 0.8718709945678711, 0.8842809796333313, 0.7633996605873108, 0.8730629086494446, 0.8862594962120056, 0.8707255721092224, 0.9385334849357605, 0.8814002871513367, 0.832962691783905, 0.8917997479438782, 0.9204534888267517, 0.8713637590408325, 0.887391984462738, 0.7394786477088928, 0.7445115447044373, 0.8109244704246521, 0.8098501563072205, 0.8366504311561584, 0.8485110402107239, 0.8594823479652405, 0.8613846898078918, 0.9136021733283997, 0.8569672107696533, 0.9126584529876709, 0.8939355611801147, 0.9067140221595764, 0.8417491912841797, 0.8629326224327087, 0.86969393491745, 0.9142895936965942, 0.9286772012710571, 0.8851278424263, 0.9105735421180725, 0.8311715126037598, 0.9025129675865173, 0.8584722876548767, 0.8879294991493225, 0.8756202459335327, 0.9510729908943176, 0.9273930191993713, 0.8471354246139526, 0.8878713250160217, 0.8655425906181335, 0.8587066531181335, 0.9171183109283447, 0.903677225112915, 0.9425997734069824, 0.9003053307533264, 0.9146130681037903, 0.903497576713562, 0.819485604763031, 0.9461891055107117, 0.9070600867271423, 0.8471458554267883, 0.9047021865844727, 0.8292884230613708, 0.7709771394729614, 0.8230634331703186, 0.8755686283111572, 0.8649976849555969, 0.9285871386528015, 0.9015631079673767, 0.8416586518287659, 0.7973902821540833, 0.8686237931251526, 0.9492141604423523, 0.8865233063697815, 0.8921558260917664, 0.8893871903419495, 0.8335056900978088, 0.8804749846458435, 0.8709704875946045, 0.8345614075660706, 0.7874241471290588, 0.8608960509300232, 0.8904466032981873, 0.8669386506080627, 0.8988046050071716, 0.8698534965515137, 0.9037775993347168, 0.8972234725952148, 0.7769801616668701, 0.8682170510292053, 0.7988002896308899, 0.8844192624092102, 0.9045449495315552, 0.8755543231964111, 0.9189135432243347, 0.9087211489677429, 0.8498680591583252, 0.8848246932029724, 0.9204336404800415, 0.872713029384613, 0.9115182161331177, 0.8510575890541077, 0.9206091165542603, 0.8077176213264465, 0.9252683520317078, 0.8777438402175903, 0.9217234253883362, 0.9003514647483826, 0.7518511414527893, 0.785489022731781, 0.7875851392745972, 0.8033740520477295, 0.7987759709358215, 0.881964921951294, 0.891259491443634, 0.8988003730773926, 0.8649353384971619, 0.8699694871902466, 0.9192754626274109, 0.8841197490692139, 0.8786904215812683, 0.8539451360702515, 0.798083484172821, 0.879423201084137, 0.9399048686027527, 0.9012212157249451, 0.9368417263031006, 0.9199965000152588, 0.8709660172462463, 0.8727210164070129, 0.8632351756095886, 0.9085493683815002, 0.8970133662223816, 0.8760180473327637, 0.8677230477333069, 0.8812413811683655, 0.8471333384513855, 0.7526929974555969, 0.8795494437217712, 0.8643879294395447, 0.8676385283470154, 0.8808974623680115, 0.916472852230072, 0.9031177759170532, 0.9230430722236633, 0.7640907168388367, 0.8996953964233398, 0.8936066031455994, 0.9135892987251282, 0.8990606665611267, 0.8596836924552917, 0.8524754643440247, 0.9096459150314331, 0.8853994011878967, 0.6763896346092224, 0.9151228070259094, 0.897858202457428, 0.8961899876594543, 0.928699254989624, 0.7400637269020081, 0.8037208914756775, 0.8305603265762329, 0.8611451983451843, 0.9316384196281433, 0.9290404915809631, 0.9093257784843445, 0.9248046875, 0.8972406387329102, 0.941148579120636, 0.8878061175346375, 0.9602035284042358, 0.9147467017173767, 0.9134427905082703, 0.9475623965263367, 0.8565327525138855, 0.9264340400695801, 0.8703986406326294, 0.821908175945282, 0.8733863234519958, 0.9389446973800659, 0.9371216893196106, 0.8867599964141846, 0.8592431545257568, 0.8564869165420532, 0.9037602543830872, 0.935420572757721, 0.9112640023231506, 0.9753507971763611, 0.9321954250335693, 0.9149309992790222, 0.9105619192123413, 0.9280521273612976, 0.9303964972496033, 0.891141951084137, 0.9566813707351685, 0.8406549096107483, 0.8706467747688293, 0.873184323310852, 0.8744260668754578, 0.8433188796043396, 0.8860233426094055, 0.8872843980789185, 0.8858726620674133, 0.9317505359649658, 0.8713867664337158, 0.7930801510810852, 0.8349267244338989, 0.6641715168952942, 0.872887909412384, 0.8879478573799133, 0.8951699733734131, 0.8593313694000244, 0.8547323942184448, 0.8792238235473633, 0.8670033812522888, 0.7621663212776184, 0.9231743216514587, 0.929545521736145, 0.8469331860542297, 0.8596102595329285, 0.9309767484664917, 0.8869054913520813, 0.9139939546585083, 0.900603711605072, 0.9373244643211365, 0.9154364466667175, 0.9002780914306641, 0.9404183030128479, 0.9212198257446289, 0.9102056622505188, 0.8949553370475769, 0.9142454266548157, 0.9314061999320984, 0.8731150031089783, 0.934646487236023, 0.9105396270751953, 0.8868793845176697, 0.8965193629264832, 0.9029764533042908, 0.8958138227462769, 0.9123504757881165, 0.934106171131134, 0.842033326625824, 0.9364923238754272, 0.8452463746070862, 0.9105516672134399, 0.8864789605140686, 0.8429691195487976, 0.8900920748710632, 0.9044739603996277, 0.9118282198905945, 0.844917356967926, 0.9341726303100586, 0.861839771270752, 0.9510279893875122, 0.884171724319458, 0.7375295162200928, 0.7924838662147522, 0.841502845287323, 0.8268141150474548, 0.9071345925331116, 0.9218528866767883, 0.9089238047599792, 0.9341874718666077, 0.864626407623291, 0.9351233243942261, 0.894920289516449, 0.863582968711853, 0.8764750361442566, 0.8881756663322449, 0.8185392618179321, 0.915027916431427, 0.8730708956718445, 0.8348875045776367, 0.8903040289878845, 0.8799354434013367, 0.9464084506034851, 0.8475291132926941, 0.9204621911048889, 0.899541437625885, 0.876493513584137, 0.7788962721824646, 0.9113607406616211, 0.8066655993461609, 0.8945389986038208, 0.8606053590774536, 0.9066665768623352, 0.8967049717903137, 0.8794530034065247, 0.9178307056427002, 0.8348743915557861, 0.8859648108482361, 0.7601918578147888, 0.9446539282798767, 0.8135948777198792, 0.8791969418525696, 0.9234503507614136, 0.9299244284629822, 0.9028540253639221, 0.9301086068153381, 0.8651897311210632, 0.8143340349197388, 0.9262202978134155, 0.9335307478904724, 0.9109273552894592, 0.9190577864646912, 0.9273247122764587, 0.8635926246643066, 0.9057514667510986, 0.8786900639533997, 0.8894760012626648, 0.9130628108978271, 0.896975576877594, 0.9131053686141968, 0.9132305979728699, 0.89699387550354, 0.8985952138900757, 0.9069464206695557, 0.8920536637306213, 0.8848386406898499, 0.9092474579811096, 0.8888254761695862, 0.953555166721344, 0.9251384735107422, 0.8761405944824219, 0.8938045501708984, 0.8837107419967651, 0.9186565279960632, 0.8985978960990906, 0.8526282906532288, 0.8871346116065979, 0.8875400424003601, 0.8547276854515076, 0.9102206826210022, 0.8134351372718811, 0.9050626754760742, 0.8466367721557617, 0.8953256607055664, 0.847344160079956, 0.9339495301246643, 0.8799681067466736, 0.9296141266822815, 0.9139657616615295, 0.8770727515220642, 0.8879896402359009, 0.8486601710319519, 0.8688412308692932, 0.8659527897834778, 0.8782511949539185, 0.983601987361908, 0.8170872330665588, 0.9322667717933655, 0.8701109290122986, 0.8519163727760315, 0.861926794052124, 0.9072601199150085, 0.8514009118080139, 0.8555108904838562, 0.8917253017425537, 0.8203560709953308, 0.9010530114173889, 0.8896952867507935, 0.8927432894706726, 0.9065369963645935, 0.8105854392051697, 0.9138205051422119, 0.9144363403320312, 0.8776744604110718, 0.8757862448692322, 0.8572083115577698, 0.8901692628860474, 0.8303946852684021, 0.8700014352798462, 0.8916141986846924, 0.9226805567741394, 0.870117723941803, 0.9172888994216919, 0.9091058373451233, 0.9165360331535339, 0.8920104503631592, 0.8803802728652954, 0.8645791411399841, 0.89101243019104, 0.9022732377052307, 0.8676334023475647, 0.8624537587165833, 0.8949814438819885, 0.8955972790718079, 0.7431370615959167, 0.8685423731803894, 0.8069393038749695, 0.8920186161994934, 0.8511641025543213, 0.8760198950767517, 0.8686986565589905, 0.8678745031356812, 0.8635191917419434, 0.8413427472114563, 0.908833384513855, 0.755225658416748, 0.8974089026451111, 0.7813237309455872, 0.9035754799842834, 0.8326762914657593, 0.9299618005752563, 0.9343688488006592, 0.9275004267692566, 0.8603618741035461, 0.866521418094635, 0.8562939167022705, 0.8668472170829773, 0.8094391822814941, 0.9250879287719727, 0.9098162055015564, 0.9127163290977478, 0.6864789724349976, 0.8717432618141174, 0.8078917860984802, 0.8828971982002258, 0.885936439037323, 0.8494513034820557, 0.9222506284713745, 0.8642389178276062, 0.9236246943473816, 0.8923200964927673, 0.9299489855766296, 0.9186163544654846, 0.9093719124794006, 0.860603392124176, 0.9376617074012756, 0.7830233573913574, 0.9473767876625061, 0.8736750483512878, 0.8876326680183411, 0.9268093705177307, 0.9297028183937073, 0.9112826585769653, 0.8431005477905273, 0.8859628438949585, 0.8652806878089905, 0.9178510904312134, 0.8135495185852051, 0.7775542736053467, 0.8761982321739197, 0.8372754454612732, 0.8150714039802551, 0.7541059851646423, 0.909641683101654, 0.8768587708473206, 0.9063998460769653, 0.9008888602256775, 0.9374488592147827, 0.8693757057189941, 0.9072692394256592, 0.9203599095344543, 0.8765931129455566, 0.8926143050193787, 0.8754582405090332, 0.8457731604576111, 0.8476293683052063, 0.8399382829666138, 0.8456588387489319, 0.9129151701927185, 0.8505069613456726, 0.8566365838050842, 0.888763964176178, 0.7678261399269104, 0.8425604701042175, 0.9297357201576233, 0.9217925667762756, 0.8561100959777832, 0.8802019357681274, 0.8869127035140991, 0.9359962940216064, 0.8369945883750916, 0.9101150631904602, 0.8750579357147217, 0.886298656463623, 0.9009908437728882, 0.878918468952179, 0.8951705694198608, 0.905436098575592, 0.8782976269721985, 0.8812607526779175, 0.8915115594863892, 0.8654088377952576, 0.8758655786514282, 0.8043375015258789, 0.8139362335205078, 0.9098009467124939, 0.939038097858429, 0.9506415128707886, 0.915517270565033, 0.8636724948883057, 0.9334726333618164, 0.9390465617179871, 0.9024810791015625, 0.8883479237556458, 0.8768605589866638, 0.8966342210769653, 0.9044516086578369, 0.8636950254440308, 0.9424551725387573, 0.8236460089683533, 0.8087003827095032, 0.82194584608078, 0.9134133458137512, 0.800323486328125, 0.9313469529151917, 0.9057828783988953, 0.9551333785057068, 0.8864310383796692, 0.9522390961647034, 0.7559546828269958, 0.8930801153182983, 0.8691338300704956, 0.8738476634025574, 0.9483782052993774, 0.8842194676399231, 0.892145574092865, 0.8576627969741821, 0.9196670651435852, 0.7543273568153381, 0.8831969499588013, 0.8433532118797302, 0.856058657169342, 0.9100345373153687, 0.8289886116981506, 0.9356516003608704, 0.8897036910057068, 0.8315508365631104, 0.9589173197746277, 0.9174225330352783, 0.8338078260421753, 0.8923580050468445, 0.9454682469367981, 0.8492280840873718, 0.9477377533912659, 0.9376401305198669, 0.8758611679077148, 0.891842782497406, 0.8040187954902649, 0.8177513480186462, 0.9377275705337524, 0.8418994545936584, 0.9201729893684387, 0.8796790242195129, 0.9121886491775513, 0.89024817943573, 0.8918485045433044, 0.9436056613922119, 0.8634554743766785, 0.8504689335823059, 0.9034863710403442, 0.8386717438697815, 0.8709032535552979, 0.792635977268219, 0.9065943956375122, 0.9115824103355408, 0.819370448589325, 0.9003185629844666, 0.9229888319969177, 0.9139797687530518, 0.8740933537483215, 0.8808866143226624]}